Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB437.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 241.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) State administrators and all investigators shall have the full police powers of peace officers, except as provided
in subsection (2) of this subsection, and their jurisdiction shall be coextensive with the state. They may
inspect any premises where alcoholic beverages are manufactured, sold, stored, or otherwise trafficked in,
without first obtaining a search warrant. They may confiscate any contraband property. The jurisdiction and
police powers of state administrators and all investigators during an emergency declared under KRS Chapter
39A shall be subject to the limitations of KRS 39A.090.
(2) A state administrator shall not have the power to make arrests unless he or she is certified in accordance
with KRS 15.380 to 15.404.
Section 2. KRS 241.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The fiscal court of any county in which traffic in alcoholic beverages is not forbidden under KRS
Chapter 242 may by resolution declare that regulation of the traffic in that county is necessary.
(b) The county judge/executive shall immediately constitute a county alcoholic beverage control
administrator for the county. However, the county judge/executive may decline to accept this office, or
after accepting the office, the county judge/executive may resign from the office, and in either event,
notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 241.120, 241.140, and[ to and including KRS] 241.150, the
county judge/executive may promptly appoint a person:
1. At least thirty (30) years of age;[,]
2. Who at the time of the appointment has been a citizen of the state and a resident of that county
for at least two (2) years next preceding the date of appointment;[,] and
3. Who is able to qualify to serve at the pleasure of the county judge/executive as county alcoholic
beverage control administrator for that county.
Before entering upon the duties of county alcoholic beverage control administrator appointed by the
county judge/executive, the appointee shall take the oath prescribed by Section 228 of the Constitution.
Upon the qualification and appointment of this person as county alcoholic beverage control
administrator for the county, the person shall immediately notify the department.
(2) The compensation of the county alcoholic beverage control administrator, appointed by the county
judge/executive, shall be fixed by the fiscal court in accordance with KRS 64.530. The county judge/executive
may also appoint any investigators and clerks deemed necessary for the proper conduct of the county alcoholic
beverage control administrator's office, their salaries likewise shall be fixed by the fiscal court pursuant to
KRS 64.530, and they will serve at the pleasure of the county judge/executive.
(3) No person shall be a county alcoholic beverage control administrator, an investigator, or an employee of the
county under the supervision of the county alcoholic beverage control administrator, who would be
disqualified to be a member of the board under KRS 241.100.
(4) (a) The county alcoholic beverage control administrator, appointed by the county judge/executive, and the
administrator's investigators, shall have full police powers of peace officers, and their jurisdiction shall
be over the unincorporated areas of the county and within the corporate limits of any city in the county
not having its own administrator. They may inspect any premises where alcoholic beverages are
manufactured, sold, stored, or otherwise trafficked in, without first obtaining a search warrant.
(b) The [county judge/executive, serving as the ]county alcoholic beverage control administrator, and any
investigator appointed by the administrator, shall not have the power to make arrests unless he or she
is certified in accordance with[under] KRS 15.380 to 15.404.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) Before entering upon official duties, each county administrator shall take the oath prescribed in Section 228 of
the Constitution.
Section 3. KRS 241.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The city administrator in each city of the first class or the administrator in a consolidated local
government, and any investigators and clerks deemed necessary for the proper conduct of this office,
shall be appointed by the mayor.
(b) The city administrator in each city of the first class or the administrator in a county containing a
consolidated local government, and the administrator's investigators, shall have full police powers of
peace officers, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, and their jurisdiction shall be
coextensive with boundaries of the city of the first class or the boundaries of the county in a county
containing a consolidated local government.
(c) They may inspect any premises where alcoholic beverages are manufactured, sold, stored, or otherwise
trafficked in, without first obtaining a search warrant.
(2) (a) The city administrator in each city, other than a consolidated local government, and any investigators
and clerks deemed necessary for the proper conduct of this office shall be appointed by the city
manager if there is one. If there is no city manager, the city administrator and any investigators or clerks
shall be appointed by the mayor.
(b) Except as provided under subsection (5) of this section, the jurisdiction of a city administrator
appointed pursuant to this subsection shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the city, and the city
administrator and the administrator's investigators shall have the same powers authorized under
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) No person shall be an administrator, an investigator, or an employee of the city or a consolidated local
government under the supervision of the administrator, who would be disqualified to be a member of the board
under KRS 241.100.
(4) Before entering upon official duties, each city administrator shall take the oath prescribed in Section 228 of the
Constitution. An appointed city alcoholic beverage control administrator shall immediately notify the
department of qualification and appointment.
(5) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an administrator or investigator appointed
under this section shall not have the power to make arrests unless he or she is certified in accordance
with KRS 15.380 to 15.404.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to any individual serving as an administrator in a consolidated local
government on the effective date of this Act.
Section 4. KRS 241.230 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The urban-county administrator in each urban-county government and any investigators and clerks
deemed necessary for the proper conduct of the office, shall be appointed by the mayor.
(b) The urban-county administrator, and the urban-county administrator's investigators, shall have full
police powers of peace officers, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, and their
jurisdiction shall be coextensive with the urban-county governments. They may inspect any premises
where alcoholic beverages are manufactured, sold, stored, or otherwise trafficked in, without first
obtaining a search warrant.
(2) No person shall be an urban-county administrator, an investigator, or an employee of the urban-county
government under the supervision of the urban-county administrator, who would be disqualified to be a
member of the board under KRS 241.100.
(3) Before entering upon official duties, each urban-county administrator shall take the oath prescribed in Section
228 of the Constitution. An appointed urban-county alcoholic beverage control administrator shall
immediately notify the department of qualification and appointment.
(4) An urban-county administrator or investigator appointed under this section shall not have the power to
make arrests unless he or she is certified in accordance with KRS 15.380 to 15.404.
Section 5. KRS 244.290 is amended to read as follows:

CHAPTER 143 3
(1) (a) A licensee authorized to sell distilled spirits or wine at retail shall be permitted to sell and deliver
distilled spirits and wine during the hours the polls are open on any primary, or regular, local option, or
special election day unless it is located where the legislative body of a city, urban-county government,
consolidated local government, charter county government, unified local government, or the fiscal court
of a county adopts an ordinance after June 25, 2013, that prohibits the sale of distilled spirits and wine
or limits the hours and times in which distilled spirits and wine may be sold within its jurisdictional
boundaries on any primary, or regular, local option, or special election day during the hours the polls
are open.
(b) This subsection shall only apply in a wet or moist territory.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary, the fiscal court
of a county shall not by ordinance or any other means:
1. Supersede, reverse, or modify any decision made pursuant to this subsection by the legislative
body of a city within that county; or
2. Impose an action upon a city within that county when that city has taken no formal action
pursuant to this subsection.
(2) In any county containing a city of the first class, or a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty
thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census in which the sale of distilled spirits and
wine by the drink is permitted under KRS Chapter 242, an election on the question of permitting the sale of
distilled spirits and wine by the drink on Sunday may be held as provided in KRS Chapter 242.
(3) Except as permitted by KRS 243.050 and subsection (4) of this section, a licensee authorized to sell distilled
spirits or wine at retail shall not sell or deliver distilled spirits and wine between midnight and 6 a.m. or at any
time during the twenty-four (24) hours of a Sunday.
(4) (a) A licensee authorized to sell distilled spirits and wine at retail may sell and deliver distilled spirits and
wine on Sunday and during the hours and times as permitted by local ordinance of the legislative body
of a city, urban-county government, consolidated local government, charter county government, unified
local government, or the county with local jurisdiction. These ordinances shall not prohibit the sale, gift,
or delivery of distilled spirits or wine between 6 a.m. and 12 midnight any day, except Sunday.
(b) A licensee authorized to sell distilled spirits and wine by the drink at retail may sell distilled spirits
and wine by the drink on Sunday and during the times and hours as permitted by a local ordinance
of the legislative body of an urban-county government, consolidated local government, charter
county government, unified local government, city, or county with local jurisdiction. The ordinance
shall not prohibit the sale or gift of distilled spirits and wine by the drink between 6 a.m. and
midnight during any day, except Sunday.
(5) In any territory containing a licensed small farm winery that is permitted to sell alcoholic beverages under
KRS Chapter 242, the sale of alcoholic beverages at the small farm winery on Sunday may be permitted if:
(a) The legislative body of the local government having jurisdiction approves by local ordinance the sale of
alcoholic beverages on Sunday in strict accordance with the sales permitted by KRS 243.155 on the
licensed premises of a small farm winery during the hours and times as permitted in the local ordinance;
or
(b) A limited sale precinct election on the issue of Sunday sales is approved after meeting the requirements
of KRS 242.1241.
(6) In any county containing a city of the first class or in any city located in that county in which the sale of
distilled spirits and wine is permitted under KRS Chapter 242, the distilled spirits administrator may issue a
license to holders of a quota retail drink license or a special private club license that permits the sale of
distilled spirits and wine by the drink on Sunday from 1 p.m. until the prevailing time for that locality.
Section 6. KRS 244.480 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as permitted by subsection (4) of this section, no brewer or distributor shall deliver any malt beverages
on Sunday or between the hours of midnight and 6 a.m. on any other day.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) Except as permitted by subsection (4) of this section, a licensee authorized to sell malt beverages at retail shall
not sell, give away, or deliver any malt beverages between midnight and 6 a.m. or at any time during the
twenty-four (24) hours of a Sunday.
(3) (a) A licensee authorized to sell malt beverages at retail may sell malt beverages during the hours the polls
are open on a primary, or regular, local option, or special election day unless the licensee is located
where the legislative body of an urban-county government, consolidated local government, charter
county government, unified local government, city, or county, in which traffic in malt beverages is
permitted by KRS Chapter 242 has adopted an ordinance after June 25, 2013, that prohibits the sale of
alcoholic beverages or limits the hours and times in which alcoholic beverages may be sold within its
jurisdictional boundaries on any primary, or regular, local option, or special election day.
(b) This subsection shall only apply in a wet or moist territory.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary, the fiscal court
of a county shall not by ordinance or any other means:
1. Supersede, reverse, or modify any decision made pursuant to this subsection by the legislative
body of a city within that county; or
2. Impose an action upon a city within that county when that city has taken no formal action
pursuant to this subsection.
(4) (a) A licensee may sell or deliver malt beverages on Sunday and during the times and hours as permitted by
a local ordinance of the legislative body of an urban-county government, consolidated local
government, charter county government, unified local government, city, or county with local
jurisdiction. The ordinance shall not prohibit the sale, gift, or delivery of any malt beverages between 6
a.m. and midnight during any day, except Sunday.
(b) A licensee authorized to sell malt beverages by the drink at retail may sell malt beverages by the drink
on Sunday and during the times and hours as permitted by a local ordinance of the legislative body
of an urban-county government, consolidated local government, charter county government, unified
local government, city, or county with local jurisdiction. The ordinance shall not prohibit the sale or
gift of any malt beverages by the drink between 6 a.m. and midnight during any day, except Sunday.
Signed by Governor April 1, 2025.